Utah statutes.
53A-11-903.   Suspension and expulsion procedures -- Notice to parents -- Distribution of policies.

(1) (a)  Policies required under this part shall include written procedures for the suspension and expulsion of, or denial of admission to, a student, consistent with due process and other provisions of law.

(b) (i)  The policies required in Subsection (1)(a) shall include a procedure directing public schools to notify the custodial parent and, if requested in writing by a noncustodial parent, the noncustodial parent of the suspension and expulsion of, or denial of admission to, a student.

(ii)  Subsection (1)(b)(i) does not apply to that portion of school records which would disclose any information protected under a court order.

(iii)  The custodial parent is responsible for providing to the school a certified copy of the court order under Subsection (1)(b)(ii) through a procedure adopted by the local school board or the governing board of a charter school.

(2) (a)  Each local school board or governing board of a charter school shall provide for the distribution of a copy of a school's discipline and conduct policy to each student upon enrollment in the school.

(b)  A copy of the policy shall be posted in a prominent location in each school.

(c)  Any significant change in a school's conduct and discipline policy shall be distributed to students in the school and posted in the school in a prominent location.



Amended by Chapter 161, 2007 General Session

